Tennessee statutes. Title 38 Prevention And Detection Of Crime
Part 1

Evidence of Crimes

38-1-101. Reports to law enforcement officials of certain types of injuries — Immunity for reporting — Exception.

All hospitals, clinics, sanitariums, doctors, physicians, surgeons, nurses, pharmacists, undertakers, embalmers, or other persons called upon to tender aid to persons suffering from any wound or other injury inflicted by means of a knife, pistol, gun, or other deadly weapon, or by other means of violence, or suffering from the effects of poison, or suffocation, or where a wound or injury is reasonably believed to have resulted from exposure to a methamphetamine laboratory or a methamphetamine related fire, explosion, or chemical release, or appears to be suffering from or to have been the victim of female genital mutilation in violation of § 39-13-110, shall report the same immediately to the chief of police, if the injured person is in or brought into or the injury occurred in an incorporated town or city, or to the sheriff if the injured person is in or brought into or the injury occurred in the county outside the corporate limits of any incorporated town or city, and shall also, in either event, report the same immediately to the district attorney general or a member of the district attorney general’s staff of the judicial district in which the injured person is, or has been brought into, or the injury occurred. Such report shall state the name, residence, and employer of such person, if known, such person’s whereabouts at the time the report is made, the place the injury occurred, and the character and extent of such injuries.

No later than January 15 of each year, district attorneys general shall report the number of reports of a person who appeared to be suffering from or to have been the victim of female genital mutilation in violation of § 39-13-110 received pursuant to subdivision (a)(1) to the senate judiciary committee and the judiciary committee of the house of representatives.

Injuries to minors that are required to be reported by § 37-1-403 are not required to be reported under this section.

Where a person acts in good faith in making a report under subsection (a), that person shall be immune from any civil liability and shall have an affirmative defense to any criminal liability arising from that protected activity.

There exists a rebuttable presumption that a person making a report under subsection (a) is doing so in good faith.

For purposes of this part, “person” means any individual, firm, partnership, co-partnership, association, corporation, governmental subdivision or agency, or other organization or other legal entity, or any agent, servant, or combination of persons thereof.

The reporting provisions in subsection (a) do not apply if the person seeking or receiving treatment:

Is 18 years of age or older;

Objects to the release of any identifying information to law enforcement officials; and

Is a victim of a sexual assault offense or domestic abuse as defined in § 36-3-601.

This exception shall not apply and the injuries shall be reported as provided in subsection (a) if the injuries incurred by the sexual assault or domestic abuse victim are considered by the treating healthcare professional to be life threatening, or the victim is being treated for injuries inflicted by strangulation, a knife, pistol, gun, or other deadly weapon.

A hospital, healthcare provider or other person who is required to report under subsection (a) shall be immune from civil liability for not reporting if in good faith the hospital, healthcare provider or other person does not report the injury in order to comply with this subsection (e).

If a person injured as provided in subsection (a) is first treated by an EMT, EMT-P, emergency medical or rescue worker, firefighter or other first responder, it shall not be the duty of the first responder to determine if the patient comes within the provisions of subdivision (e)(1). If the first responder transports the patient to a healthcare facility, the first responder’s duty is to notify the treating physician or emergency room staff at the facility of the suspected cause of the patient’s injury. If the patient is not transported to a healthcare facility, the first responder shall report the result of the call to the 911 center.

Acts 1943, ch. 107, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 5717.32 (Williams, § 5717.35); Acts 1963, ch. 247, § 1; 1965, ch. 60, § 7; 1973, ch. 81, § 5; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 38-601; Acts 2005, ch. 18, § 4; 2012, ch. 688, §§ 1, 2; 2012, ch. 817, § 1; 2012, ch. 1093, § 1; 2018, ch. 619, § 1; 2019, ch. 345, § 50.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2005, ch. 18, § 1 provided that the act may be cited as the “Meth-Free Tennessee Act of 2005.”

Amendments. The 2018 amendment added (a)(2).

The 2019 amendment substituted “judiciary” for “criminal justice” preceding “committee of the house” in (a)(2).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 619, § 2. July 1, 2018.

Acts 2019, ch. 345, § 148. May 10, 2019.

Cross-References. Notice of death under suspicious, unusual or unnatural circumstances, § 38-7-108.

Registration of persons acting as law enforcement officers, § 8-8-221.

Law Reviews.

Defective Products: Extension of Strict Liability to Bystanders (Dix W. Noel), 38 Tenn. L. Rev. 1 (1970).

38-1-102. Removing or disturbing body or other articles at scene of death unlawful.

It is unlawful for any person to touch, disturb, move or remove the body, clothing, personal effects, or weapons of, at or near any person who has died or reasonably appears to have died from wounds or injuries inflicted by means of a knife, pistol, gun, or other deadly weapon, or by other means of violence, drowning, suffocation, poison, or hanging, until the immediate notification and arrival on the death scene or place where such body is found, of the chief of police, or the chief of police's lawful representative, if the body is found in an incorporated town or city, or of the sheriff or the sheriff's lawful representative, if the body is found in the county outside the corporate limits of any incorporated town or city or of the district attorney general or a member of the district attorney general's staff of the judicial district in which such body is found.

Acts 1943, ch. 107, § 2; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 5717.33 (Williams, § 5717.36); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 38-602.

Compiler's Notes. The offense in this section may have been affected by the Criminal Sentencing Reform Act of 1989. See §§ 39-11-114, 40-35-110, 40-35-111.

Cross-References. Notice of death under suspicious, unusual or unnatural circumstances, § 38-7-108.

Restrictions on removal of body, § 38-7-108.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 27.102.

38-1-103. Violation of §§ 38-1-101 and 38-1-102.

Any person who knowingly fails to make the report required by § 38-1-101 within twenty-four (24) hours of tendering aid for any wound or injury as described in § 38-1-101 commits a Class A misdemeanor.

Any person in violation of § 38-1-102 commits a Class A misdemeanor.

Acts 1943, ch. 107, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 5717.34 (Williams, § 5717.37); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 38-603; Acts 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 2012, ch. 688, § 3.

Code Commission Notes.

The misdemeanor in this section has been designated as a Class A misdemeanor by authority of § 40-35-110, which provides that an offense designated a misdemeanor without specification as to category is a Class A misdemeanor. See also § 39-11-114.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Sentencing for misdemeanors, § 40-35-302.

38-1-104. Autopsies authorized on application of district attorney general.

Whenever the district attorney general of any judicial district in this state is of the opinion that any death occurring in any county in that district attorney general's judicial district has proceeded from a felonious cause, and that the cause of death cannot be adequately and safely determined in the absence of an autopsy upon the body of the deceased, the district attorney general may file with the judge of the court having criminal jurisdiction the district attorney general's sworn petition, which shall set forth the district attorney general's belief that the death in question proceeded from a felonious cause, that the cause of death cannot be adequately determined in the absence of an autopsy and the reasons that actuate the district attorney general's belief as to the felonious nature of such death. Such petition may be presented to the judge having criminal jurisdiction, either in term time or in vacation, and either in the county in which it is claimed that the homicide occurred or in any other county of the judicial district, and the judge shall have power and authority to pass upon the same in any county of that judge's district. When known or reasonably ascertainable, a copy of the petition shall be served upon the next of kin of the deceased.

Upon the presentation of the petition to the judge having jurisdiction, the judge shall be authorized to consider the petition and in the exercise of sound judicial discretion, either make or deny an order authorizing an autopsy to be performed upon the body of the deceased. If the judge grants the petition, it shall then be the duty of the district attorney general to authorize the performance of the autopsy by some competent physician and to take all action necessary toward such end, including the disinterment of the body of the deceased should the body have been interred. The physician holding the autopsy shall file in the office of the clerk of the court having criminal jurisdiction in the county a full and complete report of the physician's findings in connection with the autopsy, which report shall be available to such parties as may be interested in the report.

The costs and expense of the autopsy shall be presented to and approved by the trial judge making the order for the autopsy, and upon approval by the trial judge, shall be payable by the state as other costs, chargeable to the state, are paid.

Acts 1949, ch. 61, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 9966.1 (Williams, § 5717.38); Acts 1973, ch. 195, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 38-604; Acts 1986, ch. 588, § 1.

Cross-References. Authority to order autopsy only when recommended by county coroner and medical examiner, § 38-7-106.

Post-mortem examinations, title 38, ch. 7.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 27.102.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Criminal Procedure, § 26.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1986, 54 Tenn. L. Rev. 457 (1987).

Attorney General Opinions. Payment of costs of autopsies, OAG 96-034 (3/7/96).

38-1-105. Failure to report discovery of dead body.

It is a Class A misdemeanor for any person who discovers an unattended dead human body, or any part of a dead human body, to fail to report the discovery immediately, by the fastest available means of communication, to the chief of police if the body, or any part of the body, is discovered in an incorporated town or city, or to the sheriff if the body, or any part of the body, is discovered in the county outside the corporate limits of any incorporated town or city.

Acts 1967, ch. 56, § 1; T.C.A., § 38-605; Acts 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6.

Code Commission Notes.

The misdemeanor in this section has been designated as a Class A misdemeanor by authority of § 40-35-110, which provides that an offense designated a misdemeanor without specification as to category is a Class A misdemeanor. See also § 39-11-114.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Sentencing for misdemeanors, § 40-35-302.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 28.119.

38-1-106. Notification to next of kin — Determination of “seriously injured”.

Law enforcement officers and employees of law enforcement agencies shall make a reasonable effort to promptly notify the next of kin of any person who has been killed or seriously injured in an accidental manner before any statement, written or spoken, is delivered or transmitted to the press by any law enforcement official, employee or agency, disclosing the decedent's or seriously injured person's name.

For the purposes of the notification requirements of this section, the investigating officer shall make the determination, based upon the officer's personal opinion, as to whether a person is “seriously injured.” Neither the officer nor the officer's employer shall incur any liability based upon the officer's opinion as to whether a person is seriously injured or not.

Acts 1996, ch. 878, § 1.